Utah statutes.
73-5a-304.   Final inspection.
(1)  Following construction and prior to impounding any water, the state
engineer shall undertake a final inspection of the project.
(2)  A written final approval of the project shall be issued if:
(a)  the state engineer determines that:
(i)  the project was constructed in accordance with plans approved by the
state engineer under Sections 73-5a-203 and 73-5a-303; and
(ii)  during construction, inspections and tests were conducted as required by
Section 73-5a-301; and
(b)  the emergency action plan and standard operating plan meet the
requirements set forth in rules adopted by the state engineer.
(3) (a)  The state engineer may require the owner to:
(i)  submit a formal operating plan for the initial filling of the reservoir;
or
(ii)  follow certain procedures during the initial filling of the reservoir.
(b)  Failure to submit the operating plan or follow the specified procedures
shall result in revocation of the final approval.
